Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 85

Foreign Trade Zone Act

7-85-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Foreign Trade Zone Act.”

Acts 1981, ch. 411, § 1.

Cross-References. Metropolitan government port authorities, title 7, ch. 5.

Power of municipalities to own property outside boundaries, §6-54-103.

Regional planning, title 13, ch. 3, part 3.

Tennessee River Four-County Port Authority Act, title 64, ch. 4.

Zoning powers of counties, title 13, ch. 7, part 1.

Zoning powers of municipalities, title 13, ch. 7, part 2.

Zoning powers of municipalities outside their boundaries, title 13, ch. 7, part 3.

7-85-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Foreign trade subzone” means a foreign trade zone established in an area separate from an existing foreign trade zone for one (1) or more of the specialized purposes of storing, manipulating, manufacturing, or exhibiting goods;

“Foreign trade zone” means a foreign trade zone established pursuant to 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a-81u, or any laws of the United States enacted in lieu of 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a-81u;

“Private corporation” means any corporation not for profit, other than a public corporation, formed under the laws of the state of Tennessee for the purpose of establishing, operating and maintaining foreign trade zones and foreign trade subzones; and

“Public corporation” means the state of Tennessee, any political subdivision or public agency of the state, any municipal corporation formed under the laws of the state of Tennessee, or any corporate instrumentality of the state of Tennessee, of any political subdivision or public agency of the corporate instrumentality, or of such a municipal corporation.

Acts 1981, ch. 411, § 2.

7-85-103. Establishment, operation and maintenance.

Any public or private corporation has the power to apply to the proper authorities of the United States for a grant of the right to establish, operate, and maintain foreign trade zones and subzones under 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a-81u, and, when the grant is issued, to accept the grant and to establish, operate, and maintain the foreign trade zones and foreign trade subzones and to do all things necessary and proper to carry into effect the establishment, operation, and maintenance of such zones and subzones in accordance with applicable federal and state law.

Acts 1981, ch. 411, § 3.

Cross-References. Establishment of foreign trade zones, §7-5-107(6).